apertium-ita.ita.dix
<pardef n="abbarbic/are__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>heremmo</l>   <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>herei</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hereste</l>   <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>heresti</l>   <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>herebber</l>  <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>herebbero</l> <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>herebbe</l>   <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>heremo</l>    <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>herò</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>herete</l>    <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>herai</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>heran</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>heranno</l>   <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>herà</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ando</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ando</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ammo</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ai</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aste</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>asti</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aron</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arono</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ò</l>         <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hiamo</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hiamo</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantiamo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ate</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ate</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>hin</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hino</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hi</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ar</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avamo</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avo</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avate</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avi</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avan</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avano</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ava</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>assimo</l>    <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>assi</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aste</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>assi</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>asser</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>assero</l>    <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>asse</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ate</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ate</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantate"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ata</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ata</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantata"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ati</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ati</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantati"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ato</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ato</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantato"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hiamo</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ate</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hi</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>an</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hiamo</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hi</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hiate</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hi</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>hin</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hino</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hi</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

<e lm="abbicare">        <i>abbic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="abbriccare">      <i>abbricc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="accecare">        <i>accec</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acetificare">     <i>acetific</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="adescare">        <i>adesc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="affocare">        <i>affoc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="disgregare">      <i>disgreg</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ammalare">        <i>ammal</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="asciugare">       <i>asciug</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="autoaggregare">   <i>autoaggreg</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="autoreplicare">   <i>autoreplic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bivaccare">       <i>bivacc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bucare">          <i>buc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="castigare">       <i>castig</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="certificare">     <i>certific</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="classificare">    <i>classific</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="confiscare">      <i>confisc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="corruscare">      <i>corrusc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dedicare">        <i>dedic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="demoltiplicare">  <i>demoltiplic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dialogare">       <i>dialog</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="disaggregare">    <i>disaggreg</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="disobbligare">    <i>disobblig</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="duplicare">       <i>duplic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="erogare">         <i>erog</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="falcare">         <i>falc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fluidificare">    <i>fluidific</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fustigare">       <i>fustig</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gratificare">     <i>gratific</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="imbracare">       <i>imbrac</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="impiagare">       <i>impiag</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="incoccare">       <i>incocc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="intascare">       <i>intasc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="invocare">        <i>invoc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="levigare">        <i>levig</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="masticare">       <i>mastic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="moltiplicare">    <i>moltiplic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="navigare">        <i>navig</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pacificare">      <i>pacific</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="piantare">        <i>piant</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="postergare">      <i>posterg</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prolificare">     <i>prolific</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="quadruplicare">   <i>quadruplic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rampicare">       <i>rampic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="remigare">        <i>remig</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="riboccare">       <i>ribocc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rificcare">       <i>rificc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rintoccare">      <i>rintocc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rivangare">       <i>rivang</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="saponificare">    <i>saponific</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sbreccare">       <i>sbrecc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sciancare">       <i>scianc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sfocare">         <i>sfoc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slogare">         <i>slog</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sottopagare">     <i>sottopag</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spiegare">        <i>spieg</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sradicare">       <i>sradic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="straccare">       <i>stracc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stuccare">        <i>stucc</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="svelare">         <i>svel</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tonificare">      <i>tonific</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="triplicare">      <i>triplic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vangare">         <i>vang</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vinificare">      <i>vinific</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zoppicare">       <i>zoppic</i><par n="abbarbic/are__vblex"/></e>
